Utah statutes.
19-6-313.   Priority of other statutes.
The executive director may not spend fund monies or take action under
authority of Sections 19-6-314 through 19-6-320 to address hazardous
substances on any facility listed on the hazardous substances priority list if
the facility can be cleaned up under any other state statute.
